Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-244
Cemeteries; sale of lots; monuments; regulations.

A city of the first class by ordinance may limit the number of cemetery lots which shall be owned by one person at the same time; prescribe rules for enclosing, adorning, and erecting monuments and tombstones on cemetery lots; prohibit any diversion of the use of such lots and any improper adornment thereof; but no religious test shall be made as to the ownership of lots, the burial therein or the ornamentation of graves or lots.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, L, p. 258;

R.S.1913, § 4860;

C.S.1922, § 4028;

C.S.1929, § 16-245;

R.S.1943, § 16-244.